North Carolina statutes. Chapter 136. Transportation.
Article 2. Powers and Duties of Department and Board of Transportation.
§ 136-41.3.
Use of funds; records and annual statement; excess accumulation of funds; contracts for maintenance, etc., of streets.

Uses of Funds. — Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the funds allocated to cities and towns under the provisions of

G.S. 136-41.1

and

G.S. 136-41.2

shall be expended by said cities and towns primarily for the resurfacing of streets within the corporate limits of the municipality but may also be used for the purposes of maintaining, repairing, constructing, reconstructing or widening of any street or public thoroughfare including bridges, drainage, curb and gutter, and other necessary appurtenances within the corporate limits of the municipality or for meeting the municipality’s proportionate share of assessments levied for such purposes, or for the planning, construction and maintenance of bikeways, greenways, or sidewalks. Cities and towns shall strongly prefer the use of seeds and plants the U.S. Department of Agriculture has classified as native to North Carolina when the use of funds under this subsection includes landscaping. The funds allocated to cities and towns under the provisions of

G.S. 136-41.1

and

G.S. 136-41.2

shall not be expended for the construction of a sidewalk into which is built a mailbox, utility pole, fire hydrant, or other similar obstruction that would impede the clear passage of pedestrians on the sidewalk.

Records and Annual Statement. — Each municipality receiving funds by virtue of

G.S. 136-41.1

and 136-41.2 shall maintain a separate record of accounts indicating in detail all receipts and expenditures of such funds. It shall be unlawful for any municipal employee or member of any governing body to authorize, direct, or permit the expenditure of any funds accruing to any municipality by virtue of

G.S. 136-41.1

and 136-41.2 for any purpose not herein authorized. Any member of any governing body or municipal employee shall be personally liable for any unauthorized expenditures. On or before the first day of August each year, the treasurer, auditor, or other responsible official of each municipality receiving funds by virtue of G.S. 136-41.1 and 136-41.2 shall file a statement under oath with the Secretary of Transportation showing in detail the expenditure of funds received by virtue of G.S. 136-41.1 and 136-41.2 during the preceding year and the balance on hand. The Department of Transportation shall submit to the chairs of the Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee an annual report no later than October 1 of each year detailing the uses by each municipality of funds received under G.S. 136-41.1 and

G.S. 136-41.2

during the preceding year.

(b1)

Failure to File. —

A municipality that fails to file the statement required under subsection (b) of this section by October 1 is ineligible to receive funds allocated on October 1 under G.S. 136-41.1 or

G.S. 136-41.2

for the fiscal year in which the municipality failed to file the statement. A municipality that fails to file the statement required under subsection (b) of this section by January 1 is ineligible to receive funds allocated under G.S. 136-41.1 or G.S. 136-41.2 for the fiscal year in which the municipality failed to file the statement.

Excess Accumulation of Funds Prohibited. — No funds allocated to municipalities pursuant to

G.S. 136-41.1

and 136-41.2 shall be permitted to accumulate for a period greater than permitted by this section. Interest on accumulated funds shall be used only for the purposes permitted by the provisions of

G.S. 136-41.3

. Except as otherwise provided in this section, any municipality having accumulated an amount greater than the sum of the past 10 allocations made, shall have an amount equal to such excess deducted from the next allocation after receipt of the report required by this section. Such deductions shall be carried over and added to the amount to be allocated to municipalities for the following year. Notwithstanding the other provisions of this section, the Department shall adopt a policy to allow small municipalities to apply to the Department to be allowed to accumulate up to the sum of the past 20 allocations if a municipality’s allocations are so small that the sum of the past 10 allocations would not be sufficient to accomplish the purposes of this section.

Contracts for Maintenance and Construction. — In the discretion of the local governing body of each municipality receiving funds by virtue of

G.S. 136-41.1

and 136-41.2 it may contract with the Department of Transportation to do the work of maintenance, repair, construction, reconstruction, widening or improving the streets in such municipality; or it may let contracts in the usual manner as prescribed by the General Statutes to private contractors for the performance of said street work; or may undertake the work by force account. The Department of Transportation within its discretion is hereby authorized to enter into contracts with municipalities for the purpose of maintenance, repair, construction, reconstruction, widening or improving streets of municipalities. And the Department of Transportation in its discretion may contract with any city or town which it deems qualified and equipped so to do that the city or town shall do the work of maintaining, repairing, improving, constructing, reconstructing, or widening such of its streets as form a part of the State highway system.In the case of each eligible municipality, as defined in

G.S. 136-41.2

, having a population of less than 5,000, the Department of Transportation shall upon the request of such municipality made by official action of its governing body, on or prior to June 1, 1953, or June 1 in any year thereafter, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 1953, and for the years thereafter do such street construction, maintenance, or improvement on nonsystem streets as the municipality may request within the limits of the current or accrued payments made to the municipality under the provisions of

G.S. 136-41.1

.In computing the costs, the Department of Transportation may use the same rates for equipment, rental, labor, materials, supervision, engineering and other items, which the Department of Transportation uses in making charges to one of its own department or against its own department, or the Department of Transportation may employ a contractor to do the work, in which case the charges will be the contract cost plus engineering and inspection. The municipality is to specify the location, extent, and type of the work to be done, and shall provide the necessary rights-of-way, authorization for the removal of such items as poles, trees, water and sewer lines as may be necessary, holding the Department of Transportation free from any claim by virtue of such items of cost and from such damage or claims as may arise therefrom except from negligence on the part of the Department of Transportation, its agents, or employees.If a municipality elects to bring itself under the provisions of the two preceding paragraphs, it shall enter into a two-year contract with the Department of Transportation and if it desires to dissolve the contract at the end of any two-year period it shall notify the Department of Transportation of its desire to terminate said contract on or before April 1 of the year in which such contract shall expire; otherwise, said contract shall continue for an additional two-year period, and if the municipality elects to bring itself under the provisions of the two preceding paragraphs and thereafter fails to pay its account to the Department of Transportation for the fiscal year ending June 30, by August 1 following the fiscal year, then the Department of Transportation shall apply the said municipality’s allocation under G.S. 136-41.1 to this account until said account is paid and the Department of Transportation shall not be obligated to do any further work provided for in the two preceding paragraphs until such account is paid.Section 143-129 of the General Statutes relating to the procedure for letting of public contracts shall not be applicable to contracts undertaken by any municipality with the Department of Transportation in accordance with the provisions of the three preceding paragraphs.

Permitted Offsets to Funding. — The Department of Transportation is authorized to apply a municipality’s share of funds allocated to a municipality under the provisions of

G.S. 136-41.1

to any of the following accounts of the municipality with the said Department of Transportation, which the municipality fails to pay:

Cost sharing agreements for right-of-way entered into pursuant to

G.S. 136-66.3

, but not to exceed ten percent (10%) of any one year’s allocation until the debt is repaid,

The cost of relocating municipally owned waterlines and other municipally owned utilities on a State highway project which is the responsibility of the municipality,

For any other work performed for the municipality by the Department of Transportation or its contractor by agreement between the Department of Transportation and the municipality, and

For any other work performed that was made necessary by the construction, reconstruction or paving of a highway on the State highway system for which the municipality is legally responsible.

History.

1951, c. 260, s. 3; c. 948, s. 4; 1953, c. 1044; 1957, c. 65, s. 11; 1969, c. 665, ss. 3, 4; 1971, c. 182, s. 4; 1973, c. 193; c. 507, s. 5; 1977, c. 464, ss. 7.1, 20; c. 808; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 690, s. 1.1; 2011-145, s. 28.10(d); 2013-183, s. 3.3; 2015-241, s. 29.17D(b); 2017-57, s. 34.17(a); 2020-91, s. 4.11A.

§ 136-41.4.
Municipal use of allocated funds; election.

A municipality that qualifies for an allocation of funds pursuant to

G.S. 136-41.1

shall have the following options:

Accept all or a portion of funds allocated to the municipality for use as authorized by G.S. 136-41.3(a).

Use some or all of its allocation to match federal funds administered by the Department for independent bicycle and pedestrian improvement projects within the municipality’s limits, or within the area of any metropolitan planning organization or rural transportation planning organization.

Elect to have some or all of the allocation reprogrammed for any Transportation Improvement Project currently on the approved project list within the municipality’s limits or within the area of any metropolitan planning organization or rural transportation planning organization.

If a municipality chooses to have its allocation reprogrammed, the amount that may be reprogrammed is an amount equal to that amount necessary to complete one full phase of the project selected by the municipality or an amount that, when added to the amount already programmed for the Transportation Improvement Project selected, would permit the completion of at least one full phase of the project. The restriction set forth in this subsection shall not apply to any bicycle or pedestrian projects.

History.

2007-428, s. 5; 2013-183, s. 3.4; 2013-360, s. 34.30.

§ 136-41.5.
Annual report on use of Bicycle and Pedestrian Planning Grant funds.

The Division of Bicycle and Pedestrian Transportation of the Department of Transportation shall submit an annual report by May 15 on the progress of projects identified in plans (i) submitted to the Division over the 10-year period prior to the report and (ii) funded from Bicycle and Pedestrian Planning Grant funds. The Division shall submit the report required by this section to the chairs of the House of Representatives Appropriations Committee on Transportation, the chairs of the Senate Appropriations Committee on the Department of Transportation, and the Fiscal Research Division of the General Assembly.

History.

2017-57, s. 34.22.

§ 136-42.
[Transferred]

Transferred to

G.S. 136-42.2

by Session Laws 1971, c. 345, s. 2.

§ 136-42.1.
Archaeological objects on highway right-of-way.

The Department of Transportation is authorized to expend highway funds for reconnaissance surveys, preliminary site examinations and salvage work necessary to retrieve and record data and the preservation of archaeological and paleontological objects of value which are located within the right-of-way acquired for highway construction. The Department of Natural and Cultural Resources shall be consulted when objects of scientific or historical significance might be anticipated or encountered in highway right-of-way and a determination made by that Department as to the national, State, or local importance of preserving any or all fossil relics, artifacts, monuments or buildings. The Department of Natural and Cultural Resources shall request advice from other agencies or institutions having special knowledge or skills that may not be available in the said Department for the determination of the presence of or for the evaluation and salvage of prehistoric archaeological or paleontological remains within the highway right-of-way. The Department of Transportation is authorized to contract with the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources and to provide funds necessary to perform reconnaissance surveys, preliminary site examination and salvage operation at those sites determined by the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources to be of sufficient importance to be preserved for the inspiration and benefit of the people of North Carolina. The Department of Natural and Cultural Resources is authorized to enter into contracts and to make arrangements to perform the necessary work pursuant to this section. The Department of Natural and Cultural Resources shall assume possession and responsibility for any and all historical objects and is authorized to enter into agreements with governmental units and agencies thereof, institutions, and charitable organizations for the preservation of any or all fossil relics, artifacts, monuments, or buildings.

History.

1971, c. 345, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 48; c. 507, s. 5; 1977, c. 464, s. 7.1; 2015-241, s. 14.30(s).

§ 136-42.2.
Markers on highway; cooperation of Department of Transportation.

The Department of Transportation is hereby authorized to cooperate with the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources in marking historic spots along the State highways.

History.

1927, c. 226, s. 1; 1933, c. 172, s. 17; 1943, c. 237; 1957, c. 65, s. 11; 1971, c. 345, s. 2; 1973, c. 476, s. 48; c. 507, s. 5; 1977, c. 464, s. 7.1; 2015-241, s. 14.30(s).

§ 136-42.3.
Historical marker program.

The Department of Transportation shall transfer one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) each fiscal year to the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources for the purchase of historical markers. The Department of Transportation shall erect the markers on sites selected by the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources. This expenditure is hereby declared to be a valid expenditure of State highway maintenance funds. No provision in this section shall be construed to prevent the expenditure of any federal highway funds that may be available for this purpose.

History.

1935, c. 197; 1943, c. 237; 1951, c. 766; 1955, c. 543, s. 2; 1957, c. 65, s. 11; 1971, c. 345, s. 2; 1973, c. 476, s. 48; c. 507, s. 5; 1977, c. 464, s. 7.1; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, s. 129; 2015-241, s. 14.30(s); 2016-94, s. 35.4; 2021-180, s. 41.56.

Local Modification.

Town of Lillington:
2002-47, s. 1.

§ 136-43.
[Transferred]

Transferred to

G.S. 136-42.3

by Session Laws 1971, c. 345, s. 2.

§ 136-43.1.
Procedure for correction and relocation of historical markers.

Any person, firm or corporation who has knowledge or information, supported by historical data, books, records, writings, or other evidence, that any historical marker has been erected at an erroneous or mistaken site, or that the inscription appearing on any historical marker contains erroneous or mistaken information, shall have the privilege of presenting such knowledge or information and supporting evidence to the advisory committee described in the preamble of Public Laws 1935, c. 197 for its consideration. Upon being informed that any person desires to present such information, the Secretary of Natural and Cultural Resources shall notify such person of the date, place and time of the next meeting of the advisory committee. Any person, firm or corporation desiring to present such information to the advisory committee shall be allowed to appear before the committee for that purpose.

If, after considering the information and evidence presented, the advisory committee should find that any historical marker has been erected on an erroneous or mistaken site, or that erroneous or mistaken information is contained in the inscription appearing on any historical marker, it shall so inform the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources and the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources shall cause such marker to be relocated at the correct site, or shall cause the erroneous or mistaken inscription to be corrected, or both as the case may be.

History.

1961, c. 267; 1973, c. 476, s. 48; 2015-241, ss. 14.30(s), (t).

§ 136-44.
Maintenance of grounds.

The Department of Transportation is hereby authorized and directed through the highway supervisor of the district that includes Warren County to clean off and keep clean the premises and grounds at the old home of Nathaniel Macon, known as “Buck Springs,” which are owned by the County of Warren, and also to look after the care and keeping the grounds surrounding the grave of Miss Anne Carter Lee, daughter of General Robert E. Lee, in Warren County.

The Department of Transportation is authorized and directed through the highway supervisor of the district that includes Pender County to maintain the grounds surrounding the grave of Governor Samuel Ashe in Pender County.

History.

1939, c. 38; 1957, c. 65, s. 11; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; 1977, c. 464, s. 7.1; 2001-487, s. 125.1.